West Virginia, session 2026, HB4563.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 16a. west virginia parkways authority. §17-16A-29A. West Virginia EZ Pass transponders must be assigned to individual drivers. (a) EZ Passes issued to individual licensed drivers may be transferred among up to 5 vehicles of the same West Virginia Parkways Authority (WVPEDTA) vehicle class owned by that same licensee. (b) To participate in such transferal, all such vehicles must be enrolled with the EZ Pass program. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home